Hawaii statutes.
[§264-125]
Refund of impact fees to county. Upon the request of a county, the
department shall refund impact fees transferred to the highway development
special fund which have not been expended or encumbered for purposes
established under this part within six years after collection under part VIII
of chapter 46. [L 2004, c 155, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next